Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-940
Cemetery; improvement.

The mayor and city council of a city of the second class or village board of trustees may survey, plat, map, grade, fence, ornament, and otherwise improve all burial and cemetery grounds and avenues leading to any cemetery owned by such city or village. Such city or village may construct walks and protect ornamental trees therein and provide for paying the expenses thereof.

Laws 1879, § 69, XXXIII, p. 218;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XXXIII, p. 186;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XXXIII, p. 177;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XXXIII, p. 305;

R.S.1913, § 5167;

C.S.1922, § 4354;

C.S.1929, § 17-552;

R.S.1943, § 17-940;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 273.
August 24, 2017